Georgia statutes. TITLE 37 Mental Health
Article 2 Hospitalization and Treatment of Voluntary Patients

37-3-20.
Admission of voluntary patients; consent of parent or guardian to treatment; giving notice of rights to patient at time of admission.

The chief medical officer of any facility may receive for observation and diagnosis any patient 12 years of age or older making application therefor, any patient under 18 years of age for whom such application is made by his or her parent or guardian,
any patient who has a psychiatric advance directive and for whom such application is made by his or her mental health care agent, and any patient who has been declared legally incompetent and for whom such application is made by
his or her guardian. If found to show evidence of mental illness and to be suitable for treatment, such person may be given care and treatment at such facility; and such person may be detained by such facility until discharged
pursuant to Code Section 37-3-21 or 37-3-22. The parents or guardian of a minor child must give written consent to such treatment. An individualized service plan shall be developed for such person as soon as possible.

Any individual voluntarily admitted to a facility under this Code section shall be given notice of his or her rights under this chapter at the time of admission.

History.
Ga. L. 1952, p. 94, § 1; Ga. L. 1958, p. 697, § 2; Ga. L. 1960, p. 837, § 2; Code 1933, § 88-502, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1; Code 1933, § 88-503.1, enacted by Ga. L. 1969, p. 505, § 1; Ga. L. 1978, p. 1789, § 1;
Ga. L. 2022, p. 611, § 2-23/HB 752.

The 2022 amendment,
effective July 1, 2022, in the first sentence in subsection (a), substituted “his or her parent” for “his parent” and “his or her guardian” for “his guardian”, and inserted “any patient who has a psychiatric advance directive
and for whom such application is made by his or her mental health care agent,”; and in subsection (b), substituted “his or her rights” for “his rights” and deleted “his” preceding “admission”.

Law reviews.

For note comparing procedures for hospitalization of the mentally ill in Georgia to other jurisdictions and suggesting improvements, see 7 Mercer L. Rev. 361 (1956).

For article comparing hospitalization of mentally ill under Code 1933, Ch. 49-6, to present procedures under this chapter, see 23 Ga. B.J. 191 (1960).

For article recommending more consistency in age requirements of laws pertaining to the welfare of minors, see 6 Ga. St. B.J. 189 (1969).

For comment on Parham v. J.R., 442 U.S. 584,

99 S. Ct. 2493
,

61 L. Ed. 2
d 101 (1979); Secretary of Pub. Welfare v. Institutionalized Juveniles, 442 U.S. 640,

99 S. Ct. 2523
,

61 L. Ed. 2
d 142 (1979), regarding juvenile commitment to state mental hospitals upon application of parents or guardians, see 29 Emory L.J. 517 (1980).

For note, “Due Process Rights of Minors and Parental Authority in Civil Commitment Cases,” see 31 Mercer L. Rev. 617 (1980).

For annual survey of law on trial practice and procedure, see 62 Mercer L. Rev. 339 (2010).

37-3-21.
Discharge of voluntary patients upon recovery or termination of need for hospitalization; notice of discharge.

The chief medical officer of the facility shall discharge any voluntary patient who has recovered from his mental illness or who has sufficiently improved that the chief medical officer determines, after consideration of the recommendations of the treatment
team, that hospitalization of the patient is no longer necessary, provided that in no event shall any such patient be so discharged if, in the judgment of the chief medical officer of such facility, such discharge would be unsafe
for the patient or others. The chief medical officer may designate in writing a physician or psychologist, who may be the attending physician or treating psychologist, to make these discharge decisions. If the decision of the
designee is contrary to the recommendations of the treatment team or of a physician or psychologist member of the treatment team, the issue must go to the chief medical officer for final determination. Where there is concurrence,
the decision of the designee will be final.

Notice of discharge of patients who have been transferred from involuntary to voluntary status shall be given pursuant to Code Section 37-3-24.

History.
Ga. L. 1874, p. 91, § 1; Code 1882, § 1344a; Ga. L. 1884-85, p. 61, § 1; Civil Code 1895, § 1416; Civil Code 1910, § 1578; Ga. L. 1931, p. 7, § 41; Code 1933, § 35-206; Ga. L. 1952, p. 94, § 2; Ga. L. 1958, p. 697, § 3;
Ga. L. 1960, p. 837, § 3; Code 1933, § 88-503, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1; Code 1933, § 88-503.2, enacted by Ga. L. 1969, p. 505, § 1; Ga. L. 1978, p. 1789, § 1; Ga. L. 1991, p. 1059, § 2; Ga. L. 1992, p. 1902, § 2.

37-3-22.
Right of voluntary patient to discharge upon application; exception; procedure on denial of application for discharge; notice of discharge.

A voluntary patient, other than a minor child for whom admission has been sought by his parents or guardian, who has admitted himself to a facility pursuant to subsection (a) of Code Section 37-3-20 or any voluntary patient’s personal representative,
legal guardian, parent, spouse, attorney, or adult next of kin may request such patient’s discharge in writing at any time after his admission. If the patient was admitted on his own application and the request for discharge is
made by a person other than the patient, the discharge shall be conditioned upon the agreement of the patient thereto, unless such other person is the legal guardian of the patient’s person. The request for discharge may be submitted
to the chief medical officer or to any staff physician or staff psychologist or staff registered nurse of the facility for transmittal to the chief medical officer. If the patient or another on his behalf makes an oral request
for release to any member of the staff or other service provider, the patient must within 24 hours be given assistance in preparing a written request. The person to whom a written request is submitted shall deliver the request
to the chief medical officer within 24 hours, Saturdays, Sundays, and legal holidays excluded. Within 72 hours, excluding Sundays and legal holidays, of the delivery of a written request for release to the chief medical officer,
the patient must be discharged from the facility, unless the chief medical officer finds that the discharge would be unsafe for the patient or others, in which case proceedings for involuntary treatment must be initiated under
either Code Section 37-3-41, Code Section 37-3-61, or Code Section 37-3-81.

Notice of discharge of patients who have been transferred from involuntary to voluntary status shall be given pursuant to Code Section 37-3-24.

History.
Ga. L. 1952, p. 94, § 3; Ga. L. 1958, p. 697, § 4; Ga. L. 1960, p. 837, § 4; Code 1933, § 88-504, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1; Code 1933, § 88-503.3, enacted by Ga. L. 1969, p. 505, § 1; Ga. L. 1978, p. 1789, § 1;
Ga. L. 1983, p. 3, § 28; Ga. L. 1991, p. 1059, § 9; Ga. L. 1992, p. 6, § 37.

37-3-23.
Giving voluntary patients periodic notice of rights.

At the time of his admission and each six months thereafter, any voluntary patient admitted to a facility under Code Section 37-3-20 or transferred to voluntary status under Code Section 37-3-24 shall be notified in writing of his right to discharge upon
application under Code Section 37-3-22 and of all other rights granted to patients under this chapter.

History.
Code 1933, § 88-503.4, enacted by Ga. L. 1969, p. 505, § 1; Ga. L. 1978, p. 1789, § 1.

37-3-24.
Transfer of involuntary patients to voluntary status; notice of transfer and of discharge of patients so transferred; discharge of transferred patient charged with criminal offense.

Any involuntary patient may apply to be transferred to voluntary status of hospitalization and shall be so transferred if he is able to understand and exercise the rights and powers of a voluntary patient unless the chief medical officer finds that this
would not be in the best interest of the patient, which finding shall be entered in the patient’s clinical record and signed by the chief medical officer. In any case in which such transfer to voluntary status occurs and in any case
in which a patient transferred to voluntary status is discharged, notice of such transfer or discharge, as the case may be, shall be given: to the patient and his representatives; if the patient’s hospitalization was ordered by the
court, to the court which entered such order; if the patient was admitted to a facility under subsection (a) of Code Section 37-3-41, to the physician or psychologist executing the certificate; and, if the patient was under criminal
charges, of which the facility received written notification, by certified mail or statutory overnight delivery to the law enforcement agency originally having custody of the patient. An involuntary patient transferred to voluntary
status, which patient is under criminal charges, notice of which charges have been given in writing to the facility, may only be discharged into the physical custody of the law enforcement agency originally having custody of the patient.
Such agency shall assume such custody within five days after the mailing of notification to the agency pursuant to this Code section.

History.
Code 1933, § 88-503.5, enacted by Ga. L. 1969, p. 505, § 1; Ga. L. 1978, p. 1789, § 1; Ga. L. 1979, p. 723, § 6; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 37; Ga. L. 1991, p. 1059, § 10; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1589, § 3.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2000, p. 1589, § 16, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the amendment to this Code section is applicable with respect to notices delivered on or after July 1, 2000.